Utah statutes.
63M-1-1112.   Centers of excellence.
In accordance with Part 6, the office may award grants to the Centers of
Excellence, as defined by Section 63M-1-703, to fund development of new
technology for recycling if the program funded is a cooperative effort between
the Centers of Excellence and one or more recycling market development zones
created under this part.
